Utah statutes.
19-3-205.   Eligible party states -- Requirements regarding joinder and withdrawal from compact -- Consent of Congress.

(1)  Each of the following states is eligible to become a party to this compact: Alaska, Hawaii, Idaho, Montana, Oregon, Utah, Washington, and Wyoming. As to any eligible party, this compact becomes effective upon enactment into law by that party, but it is not initially effective until enacted into law by two states.  Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing its approval.

(2)  After the compact has initially taken effect under Subsection (1), any eligible party state may become a party to this compact by the execution of an executive order by the governor of the state.  Any state which becomes a party in this manner shall cease to be a party upon the final adjournment of the next general or regular session of its legislature or July 1, 1983, whichever occurs first, unless the compact has by then been enacted as a statute by that state.

(3)  Section 19-3-203 takes effect on July 1, 1983, if consent is given by Congress.  As provided in Public Law 96-573, Congress may withdraw its consent to the compact after every five-year period.

